Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-314
Profits from sale of electricity; how used.

All net profits derived from the sale of electrical energy under the provisions of sections 46-301 to 46-315 shall belong to the irrigation district producing it, and may be used by such district to pay its operation and maintenance expense, its bonded indebtedness, if any, or other debts, or for improvements and additions.

Laws 1931, c. 91, § 14, p. 259;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-714;

R.S.1943, § 46-314.